src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON CLASS-AS-STEM-3-INFL !!= @CODE@
+Cond-Aux1:%> # ;
+Interr+Past:%>áa # ;
+Indir+Past:%>áan # ;
+Rel+Evid:%>áas # ;
+Past+NonFact:%>áa%.ang # ;
+Ints+Past:%>áaʼahlang # ;
+Cont:%>áaʼahlanggaa # ;
+Ctfact+Pres:%>áaʼahlanggang # ;


LEXICON CLASS-E.E !!= @CODE@
+V:ee               CLASS-E.E-STEM-1-INFL ;
+V:eʼée             CLASS-E.E-STEM-2-INFL ;
+V+Ext:eedáal       CLASS-AAL-INFL  ;
+V+Circum:eegwáang  CLASS-AANG-INFL  ;
+V+Stand-Sg:eegyaʼáng            CLASS-ANG-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Stand-Sg:eegyaʼáang           CLASS-ANG-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Stand-Pl:eegyaʼáang           CLASS-AANG-INFL  ;
+V+Order:eehahl                  CLASS-AHL-INFL  ;
+V+Incep:eehid                   CLASS-ID-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Incep:eehíid                  CLASS-ID-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Almost:eesgä                  CLASS-A-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Almost:eesgáa                 CLASS-A-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Nocturn:eeʼuhlä               CLASS-A-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Nocturn:eeʼuhláa              CLASS-A-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Sit-Sg:eeʼwä                  CLASS-A-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Sit-Sg:eeʼwáa                 CLASS-A-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Sit-Pl:eeʼwaʼáang             CLASS-AANG-INFL  ;
+V+Nocturn+Distrib:eeʼuhláaʼagang   CLASS-ANG-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Nocturn+Distrib:eeʼuhláaʼagaang  CLASS-ANG-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Distrib:eeháalagang        CLASS-ANG-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Distrib:eeháalaagaang      CLASS-ANG-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Incep:eehahlhid         CLASS-ID-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Incep:eehahlhíid        CLASS-ID-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Almost:eehahlsgä        CLASS-A-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Almost:eehahlsgáa       CLASS-A-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Nocturn:eehahlʼuhlä     CLASS-A-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Order+Nocturn:eehahlʼuhláa    CLASS-A-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Incep+Order:eehidhahl         CLASS-AHL-INFL  ;
+V+Incep+Almost:eehidsgä         CLASS-A-STEM-1-INFL  ;
+V+Incep+Almost:eehidsgáa        CLASS-A-STEM-2-INFL  ;
+V+Nocturn+Order:eeʼuhlahahl     CLASS-AHL-INFL  ;

LEXICON CLASS-E.E-STEM-1-INFL !!= @CODE@
+Cond-Aux1:%> # ;
+Dir+Past:%>gán # ;
+Interr+Pres+Hab:%>gáng # ;
+Pres+Hab:%>gánggang # ;
+Pres+Hab+NonFact:%>gángang # ;
+Dir+Past+Hab:%>gíinii # ;
+Interr+Past+Hab:%>gáangaa # ;
+Indir+Past+Hab:%>gáangaan # ;
+Pl+Impv:%>ʼúu # ;
+3pl+Imm+Pres:%>ʼwáa # ;
+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres:%>ʼwáa # ;
+3pl+Simp+Pres:%>ʼwáang # ;
+3pl+Dir+Past:%>ʼwägán # ;
+3pl+Interr+Past:%>ʼáawaa # ;
+3pl+Indir+Past:%>ʼáawaan # ;
+3pl+Rel:%>ʼwáas # ;
+3pl+Rel+Evid:%>ʼáawaas # ;
+3pl+NonFact:%>ʼwáa%.ang # ;
+3pl+Past+NonFact:%>ʼáawaa%.ang # ;
+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab:%>gángʼwaa # ;
+3pl+Pres+Hab:%>gángʼwaang # ;
+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact:%>gángʼwaa%.ang # ;
+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab:%>ʼwägíinii # ;
+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab:%>ʼwägáangaa # ;
+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab:%>ʼwägáangaan # ;
+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long:%>ʼwáaäsaa # ;
+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short:%>ʼwáaäs # ;
+3pl+Simp+Fut:%>ʼwáaäsaang # ;
+3pl+Imm+Fut:%>ʼwáaäsga # ;
+3pl+Rel+Fut:%>ʼwáaäsaas # ;
+3pl+Fut+NonFact:%>ʼwáaäsaa%.ang # ;
+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut:%>ʼwáa%.ang% k̲asaʼáa # ;
+3pl+Near+Fut:%>ʼwáa%.ang% k̲asaʼáang # ;
+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut:%>ʼwáa%.ang% k̲asaasdláa # ;
+3pl+VNear+Fut:%>ʼwáa%.ang% k̲asaasdláang # ;
+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres:%>ʼwáaʼuuj # ;
+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres:%>ʼwáaʼuujang # ;
+3pl+Res:%>ʼwáaäsaaʼuujang # ;
+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres:%>ʼwáaʼus # ;
+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past:%>ʼwáaʼujaa # ;
+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab:%>ʼwáaʼuujaangaa # ;
+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut:%>ʼwáaäsaaʼus # ;
+3pl+Cert+Pres:%>ʼwáaʼahlanggang # ;
+3pl+Cert+Past:%>ʼwáaʼahlanggan # ;
+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab:%>ʼwáaʼahlanggiinii # ;
+3pl+Cert+Fut:%>ʼwáaäsaaʼahlans # ;
+3pl+Cert+Rel:%>ʼwáaʼahlans # ;
+3pl+Ints+Past:%>ʼáawaaʼahlang # ;
+3pl+Cont:%>ʼáawaaʼahlanggaa # ;
+3pl+Ctfact+Pres:%>ʼáawaaʼahlanggang # ;
+3pl+Rflx:%>ʼwáaʼahl # ;
+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr:%>ʼwáaäseehl # ;
+Neg+Sg+Impv:%>ʼáng # ;
+Neg+Imm+Pres:%>ʼángga # ;
+Neg+Interr+Simp+Pres:%>ʼáng # ;
+Neg+Simp+Pres:%>ʼánggang # ;
+Neg+Dir+Past:%>ʼánggan # ;
+Neg+Interr+Past:%>ʼáangaa # ;
+Neg+Indir+Past:%>ʼáangaan # ;
+Neg+Rel:%>ʼáns # ;
+Neg+Rel+Evid:%>ʼáangaas # ;
+Neg+NonFact:%>ʼangáng # ;
+Neg+Past+NonFact:%>ʼáangaa%.ang # ;
+Neg+Interr+Pres+Hab:%>ʼánggang # ;
+Neg+Pres+Hab:%>gángʼanggang # ;
+Neg+Pres+Hab+NonFact:%>gángʼangang # ;
+Neg+Dir+Past+Hab:%>ʼánggiinii # ;
+Neg+Interr+Past+Hab:%>ʼánggaangaa # ;
+Neg+Indir+Past+Hab:%>ʼánggaangaan # ;
+Neg+Interr+Fut+Long:%>ʼángäsaa # ;
+Neg+Interr+Fut+Short:%>ʼángäs # ;
+Neg+Simp+Fut:%>ʼángäsaang # ;
+Neg+Imm+Fut:%>ʼángäsga # ;
+Neg+Rel+Fut:%>ʼángäsaas # ;
+Neg+Fut+NonFact:%>ʼángäsaa%.ang # ;
+Neg+Bias+Imm+Pres:%>ʼángʼuuj # ;
+Neg+Bias+Simp+Pres:%>ʼángʼuujang # ;
+Neg+Res:%>ʼángäsaaʼuujang # ;
+Neg+Bias+Interr+Pres:%>ʼángʼus # ;
+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past:%>ʼángʼujaa # ;
+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab:%>ʼángʼuujaangaa # ;
+Neg+Bias+Interr+Fut:%>ʼángäsaaʼus # ;
+Neg+Cert+Pres:%>ʼáangʼahlanggang # ;
+Neg+Cert+Past:%>ʼáangʼahlanggan # ;
+Neg+Cert+Past+Hab:%>ʼáangʼahlanggiinii # ;
+Neg+Cert+Fut:%>ʼángäsaaʼahlans # ;
+Neg+Cert+Rel:%>ʼáangʼahlans # ;
+Neg+Ints+Past:%>ʼáangaaʼahlang # ;
+Neg+Cont:%>ʼáangaaʼahlanggaa # ;
+Neg+Ctfact+Pres:%>ʼáangaaʼahlanggang # ;
+Neg+Rflx:%>ʼáangʼahl # ;
+Neg+Fut+Rflx+Interr:%>ʼángäseehl # ;
+Neg+Pl+Impv:%>ʼángʼuu # ;
+Neg+3pl+Imm+Pres:%>ʼángʼwaa # ;
+Neg+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres:%>ʼángʼwaa # ;
+Neg+3pl+Simp+Pres:%>ʼángʼwaang # ;
+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past:%>ʼángʼwägan # ;
+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past:%>ʼángʼaawaa # ;
+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past:%>ʼángʼaawaan # ;
+Neg+3pl+Rel:%>ʼángʼwaas # ;
+Neg+3pl+Rel+Evid:%>ʼángʼaawaas # ;
+Neg+3pl+NonFact:%>ʼángʼwaa%.ang # ;
+Neg+3pl+Past+NonFact:%>ʼángʼaawaa%.ang # ;
+Neg+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab:%>gángʼangʼwaa # ;
+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab:%>gángʼangʼwaang # ;
+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact:%>gángʼangʼwaa%.ang # ;
+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab:%>ʼángʼwägiinii # ;
+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab:%>ʼángʼwägaangaa # ;
+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab:%>ʼángʼwägaangaan # ;
+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long:%>ʼángʼwaaäsaa # ;
+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short:%>ʼángʼwaaäs # ;
+Neg+3pl+Simp+Fut:%>ʼángʼwaaäsaang # ;
+Neg+3pl+Imm+Fut:%>ʼángʼwaaäsga # ;
+Neg+3pl+Rel+Fut:%>ʼángʼwaaäsaas # ;
+Neg+3pl+Fut+NonFact:%>ʼángʼwaaäsaa%.ang # ;
+Neg+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut:%>ʼwáa%.ang% k̲asaaʼáng # ;
+Neg+3pl+Near+Fut:%>ʼwáa%.ang% k̲asaaʼánggang # ;
+Neg+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut:%>ʼwáa%.ang% k̲asaasdläʼáng # ;
+Neg+3pl+VNear+Fut:%>ʼwáa%.ang% k̲asaasdläʼánggang # ;
+Neg+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres:%>ʼángʼwaaʼuuj # ;
+Neg+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres:%>ʼángʼwaaʼuujang # ;
+Neg+3pl+Res:%>ʼángʼwaaäsaaʼuujang # ;
+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres:%>ʼángʼwaaʼus # ;
+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past:%>ʼángʼwaaʼujaa # ;
+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab:%>ʼángʼwaaʼuujaangaa # ;
+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut:%>ʼángʼwaaäsaaʼus # ;
+Neg+3pl+Cert+Pres:%>ʼángʼwaaʼahlanggang # ;
+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past:%>ʼángʼwaaʼahlanggan # ;
+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab:%>ʼángʼwaaʼahlanggiinii # ;
+Neg+3pl+Cert+Fut:%>ʼángʼwaaäsaaʼahlans # ;
+Neg+3pl+Cert+Rel:%>ʼángʼwaaʼahlans # ;
+Neg+3pl+Ints+Past:%>ʼángʼaawaaʼahlang # ;
+Neg+3pl+Cont:%>ʼángʼaawaaʼahlanggaa # ;
+Neg+3pl+Ctfact+Pres:%>ʼángʼaawaaʼahlanggang # ;
+Neg+3pl+Rflx:%>ʼángʼwaaʼahl # ;
+Neg+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr:%>ʼángʼwaaäseehl # ;
