src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VERBS !!= @CODE@
gáwdä% k̲e%.e:gáwdä% k̲ CLASS-E.E "for S to check how people react to their absence" ;
isdä% k̲e%.e:isdä% k̲ CLASS-E.E "for S to check O by trying it out" ;
kʼugwdáng% k̲e%.e:kʼugwdáng% k̲ CLASS-E.E "for S to compare the tastes of O (pl)" ;
kʼwíi% k̲e%.e:kʼwíi% k̲ CLASS-E.E "for S to check the pronunciation of O" ;
k̲e%.e:k̲ CLASS-E.E "for S to examine, check over, appraise O" ;
xi% k̲e%.e:xi% k̲ CLASS-E.E "for S to compare the weight of O with the weight of X by hefting them" ;
x̲a% k̲e%.e:x̲a% k̲ CLASS-E.E "for S to portion O out to see if there is enough" ;
x̲e%.e:x̲ CLASS-E.E "for S to be depressed and weary" ;
